Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,137
Change in household; effect.

In the event of a change in the composition of a tenant household, the local housing agency shall have the authority to determine which member or members of the household are entitled to continued occupancy for the unexpired lease term or periodic tenancy. A local housing agency may adopt such reasonable rules and procedures governing such determinations as it deems appropriate.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 66.